Illinois, session 104th, SB3081.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 59.18 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/59.18)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2032)8    Sec. 59.18. Mahomet Aquifer Advisory Study Commission.9    (a) The Mahomet Aquifer Advisory Study Commission is 10hereby created to study and review any reports submitted to 11the Mahomet Aquifer Advisory Study Commission regarding the 12safety of carbon capture and storage in the Mahomet Aquifer 13Area and any sole source aquifer project review areas 14designated by the United States Environmental Protection 15Agency. The Commission shall also study and review any reports 16submitted to the Commission regarding the depletion or 17exhaustion of the Mahomet Aquifer resource due to expanding 18industrial withdrawals of water. The Commission shall consist 19of the following members:20        (1) the Director of the Environmental Protection 21    Agency or the Director's designee; 22        (2) the Director of Natural Resources or the 23    Director's designee;  SB3081- 2 -LRB104 18464 BDA 31906 b1        (3) the Director of the Illinois Emergency Management 2    Agency and Office of Homeland Security or the Director's 3    designee;4        (4) the Director of Agriculture or the Director's 5    designee;6        (5) the Attorney General or the Attorney General's 7    designee;8        (6) 3 members appointed by the President of the 9    Senate, only one of whom may be a Senator;10        (7) 3 members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 11    Representatives, only one of whom may be a Representative;12        (8) 3 members appointed by the Minority Leader of the 13    Senate, only one of whom may be a Senator; and14        (9) 3 members appointed by the Minority Leader of the 15    House of Representatives, only one of whom may be a 16    Representative.17    All meetings of the Mahomet Aquifer Advisory Study 18Commission shall be open to the public and shall be held within 19the Mahomet Aquifer Area region or within 25 miles of the 20region. The Mahomet Aquifer Advisory Study Commission shall 21maintain a website where all reports and studies submitted to 22or approved by the Mahomet Aquifer Advisory Study Commission 23shall be posted for public display. The University of Illinois 24shall provide administrative assistance to the Mahomet Aquifer 25Advisory Study Commission. No later than 90 days after the 26effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General   SB3081- 3 -LRB104 18464 BDA 31906 b1Assembly, the Commission shall hold its first meeting at the 2call of the Director of the Environmental Protection Agency, 3at which meeting the members shall select a chairperson from 4among themselves. After its first meeting, the Commission 5shall meet at the call of the chairperson. Members of the 6Commission shall serve without compensation. Members' terms 7shall be 3 years, and members may be reappointed by their 8respective appointing authority.9    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Prairie Research 10Institute at the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign 11shall submit a final report on the potential for carbon 12sequestration in the Mahomet Aquifer Area and any project 13review areas to the Mahomet Aquifer Advisory Study Commission 14no later than December 31, 2030. The Prairie Research 15Institute shall submit annual status reports by December 31, 162027 and December 31 of each year thereafter until the final 17report is submitted on December 31, 2030. The final report 18shall provide an assessment of the safety and risks of carbon 19dioxide storage in the Mahomet Aquifer and its project review 20areas, including, but not limited to, any effects on human, 21animal, and environmental health. The report shall review 22carbon sequestration conducted in Illinois and other similarly 23situated states, particularly how carbon sequestration affects 24aquifers and other underground water sources. The report shall 25review the permitting processes and the coordination with 26applicable federal law or regulatory commissions, including   SB3081- 4 -LRB104 18464 BDA 31906 b1the Class VI injection well permitting process.2    (c) The Mahomet Aquifer Advisory Study Commission shall 3also engage with interested stakeholders throughout the State 4to gain insights into safety perspectives from residents, 5environmental justice organizations, environmental 6nongovernmental organizations, representatives of industry, 7landowners, farm bureaus, manufacturing interests, labor 8unions, and others.9    (d) The Mahomet Aquifer Advisory Study Commission shall 10submit a final report of its findings regarding the Mahomet 11Aquifer and its project review areas to the Governor and the 12General Assembly no later than December 31, 2031. The 13Commission may file status updates with the Governor and the 14General Assembly as determined by a majority of the members.15    (e) The Mahomet Aquifer Advisory Study Commission is 16dissolved and this Section is repealed on January 1, 2032.17(Source: P.A. 104-119, eff. 1-1-26.)